test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-М_В-карандаш_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - карандаш M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      карандаш+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: каранда́ш
      карандаш+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Inan: каранда́ш
      карандаш+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: карандаша́
      карандаш+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: карандаше́
      карандаш+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: карандашу́
      карандаш+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: карандашо́м
      карандаш+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: карандаши́
      карандаш+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Inan: карандаши́
      карандаш+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: карандаше́й
      карандаш+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: карандаша́х
      карандаш+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: карандаша́м
      карандаш+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: карандаша́ми
